Vermont, session 2025-2026, H404.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1959 Acts and Resolves No. 300, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Road commissioner, no authority or duty. The voters of the Village
of Old Bennington shall not vote for road commissioners at a meeting of the
Town of Bennington nor shall a Town road commissioner have any duty or
VT LEG #380212 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.404
2025 Page 2 of 2
authority with respect to any highway, street, lane, or sidewalk within the
Village limits. [Repealed.]
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380212 v.1